Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1346.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 107(a) of the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.805, No.247), known as the Pennsylvania Municipalities 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728 Planning Code, is amended by adding definitions to read:Section 107. Definitions.--(a) The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Accessory dwelling unit," a residential living unit on the same parcel or lot on which a single-family dwelling is present or may be constructed that provides complete independent living facilities for one or more persons and may take various forms, including an attached or detached unit, a unit that is part of an accessory structure, including a detached garage, or a unit that is part of an expanded or remodeled dwelling. The term does not include a recreational vehicle.* * *"Dwelling unit," a residential living unit that provides co mplete independent living facilities for one or more persons and includes permanent provisions for living, sleeping, eating, cooking and sanitation.* * *"Recreational vehicle," a vehicle such as a bus, motor home or pickup truck with an attached camper.* * *Section 2. Section 503 of the act is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 503. Contents of Subdivision and Land Development Ordinance.--The subdivision and land development ordinance may include, but need not be limited to:* * *(4.2) Provisions for ensuring that all forms of single- family detached dwelling units are regulated uniformly 20260SB1346PN1747 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 throughout the municipality, in the event the municipality has not enacted a zoning ordinance.* * *Section 3. Section 603(l) of the act is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 603. Ordinance Provisions.--* * *(l) Zoning ordinances shall permit no-impact home-based businesses in all residential zones of the municipality as a use permitted by right, except that such permission shall not supersede any deed restriction, covenant or agreement restricting the use of land nor any master deed, bylaw or other document applicable to a [common interest ownership] planned community.(m) Accessory dwelling units under section 603.2 shall be a permitted use by right in all zoning districts in every municipality where single- family detached dwelling units are permitted uses, except that the permission may not supersede any deed restriction, covenant or agreement restricting the use of land or any master deed, bylaw or other document applicable to a planned community.Section 4. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 603.2. Accessory Dwelling Units.--(a) A municipality shall adopt an ordinance to permit the development of at least one accessory dwelling unit for each single-family detached dwelling unit, subject to reasonable regulation. (b) A permit application for an accessory dwelling unit shall be considered and approved ministerially without discretionary review or a hearing. The municipality shall approve or deny an application to create or serve an accessory dwelling unit within 14 days from the date the municipality 20260SB1346PN1747 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 receives a completed application if there is an existing single- family detached dwelling unit on the lot. If the permit application to create or serve an accessory dwelling unit is submitted with a permit application to create or serve a new single-family dwelling unit on the lot, the municipality may delay approving or denying the permit application for the accessory dwelling unit until the municipality approves or denies the permit application to create or serve the new single-family dwelling unit. If the applicant requests a delay, the 14-day time period shall be tolled for the period of the delay. If the municipality has not approved or denied the completed application within 14 days, the application shall be deemed approved. A municipality may charge a fee to reimburse it for costs incurred to review the permit application for the creation or service of an accessory dwelling unit. No renewals of a permit shall be required.(c) If a municipality denies an application for an accessory dwelling unit, the municipality shall return in writing a full set of comments to the applicant with a list of items that are defective or deficient and a description of how the application can be remedied by the applicant.(d) Accessory dwelling units may be either attached to or located within the proposed or existing single-family detached dwelling unit or detached from the proposed or existing single-family detached dwelling unit and located on the same lot as such dwelling.(e) A municipality may not establish a minimum net floor area for an accessory dwelling unit of more than 150 square feet.(f) A municipality may establish a maximum net floor area 20260SB1346PN1747 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 for an accessory dwelling unit of not less than 50% of the net floor area of the single- family detached dwelling unit or 1,250 square feet, whichever is less. (g) A municipality may establish a height limitation for an accessory dwelling unit of no less than 25 feet or the height of the single-family detached dwelling unit, whichever is less. (h) No setback shall be required for an existing living area or accessory structure or for a structure constructed in the same location and to the same dimensions as an existing structure that is converted to an accessory dwelling unit or for a portion of an accessory dwelling unit. A setback of no more than four feet from the side and rear lot lines may be required for an accessory dwelling unit that is not converted from an existing structure or a new structure constructed in the same location and to the same dimensions as an existing structure.(i) A municipality may not require a passageway between an accessory dwelling unit and a single-family detached dwelling unit, except as required by the applicable building or fire code.(j) A municipality shall not condition the approval of an accessory dwelling unit on the correction of a nonconforming use, structure or lot or require the installation of fire sprinklers in an accessory dwelling unit if such sprinklers are not required for the single-family detached dwelling unit located on the same lot.(k) A municipality, municipal authority or public utility may not consider an accessory dwelling unit to be a new residential use for the purposes of calculating connection fees or capacity charges for utilities, including water and sewer service, unless such accessory dwelling unit was constructed 20260SB1346PN1747 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 with a new single-family dwelling unit on the same lot, nor shall it be required to install a new or separate utility connection directly to an accessory dwelling unit or impose a related connection fee or capacity charge. (l) A municipality may not require owner-occupancy requirements of either the single- family detached dwelling unit or the accessory dwelling unit.(m) An accessory dwelling unit may be rented separate from the single-family detached dwelling unit but may not be sold or otherwise conveyed separate from the single-family detached dwelling unit.(n) No additional off-street parking shall be required for the construction of an accessory dwelling unit. If a garage, carport or covered parking structure is demolished in conjunction with the construction of an accessory dwelling unit or converted to an accessory dwelling unit, a municipality may not require those off- street parking spaces to be replaced. (o) An accessory dwelling unit that conforms to this section shall be deemed to be an accessory use or an accessory building and shall not be considered to exceed the allowable density for the lot upon which it is located and shall be deemed to be a residential use that is consistent with the existing general plan and zoning designations for the lot.Section 5. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1346PN1747 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324